Hawaii statutes.
[§124A-168] Payment of fines and
disposition thereof. Fines imposed by a military court may be paid to it
or to an officer executing its process. The amount of such fine may be noted
upon any state roll or account for pay of the delinquent and deducted from any
pay or allowance due or thereafter to become due the delinquent, until the fine
is liquidated. Any sum so deducted shall be returned to the military court
which imposed the fine. The officer collecting a fine or penalty imposed by a
military court upon an officer or enlisted person shall pay it within thirty
days to the director of finance to the credit of the state general fund. [L
1982, c 171, pt of §2; gen ch 1985, 1993]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next